Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1409.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-120.08, to read: START_STATUTE15-120.08. Feminine hygiene products; required provision by schools; definition A. Each school that is operated by a school district or charter school and that serves students in any of grades six through twelve shall make feminine hygiene products available in all women's and gender-neutral restrooms in the school.  Notwithstanding any other law, a school that provides feminine hygiene products pursuant to this section may not charge a student or the family of a student for a feminine hygiene product. B. For the purposes of this section, "feminine hygiene products" includes tampons and sanitary napkins. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; department of education; feminine hygiene products The sum of $2,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of education to distribute to school districts and charter schools to provide feminine hygiene products as prescribed in section 15-120.08, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act.